Virginia statutes. Title 1. General Provisions.
Article 1. Common Law and Acts of Parliament.

§ 1-200.
The common law.

The common law of England, insofar as it is not repugnant to the principles of the Bill of Rights and Constitution of this Commonwealth, shall continue in full force within the same, and be the rule of decision, except as altered by the General Assembly.

History.

Code 1919, § 2, §

1-10

; 2005, c. 839.

Transition provisions.

Chapters 2 and 3 of Title 1 and Title 7 have been rewritten, primarily as new Chapters 2.1 through 5 of Title 1, by Acts 2005, c. 839, effective October 1, 2005.

In addition to revision by Acts 2005, c. 839, §§ 1-13.23:1 [see now §

1-237

] and 7.1-40.7:1 [see now §

1-510

] were also amended by other acts passed at the 2005 Session. As required by § 30-152, the Code Commission has incorporated these amendments into the new sections.

Where appropriate, the historical citations to former sections have been added to corresponding new sections.

The case notes appearing under new sections were decided under corresponding former sections or under prior law.

For tables of corresponding former and new sections, see the tables in Volume 10.

Acts 2005, c. 839, cl. 2, provides: “That whenever any of the conditions, requirements, provisions or contents of any section or chapter of

Titles 1

and 7.1 or any other title of the Code of Virginia as such titles existed prior to October 1, 2005, are transferred in the same or modified form to a new section or chapter of Title 1 or any other title of the Code and whenever any such former section or chapter is given a new number in Title 1 or any other title, all references to any such former section or chapter of Title 1 or other title appearing in this Code shall be construed to apply to the new or renumbered section or chapter containing such conditions, requirements, provisions, contents or portions thereof.”

Acts 2005, c. 839, cl. 3, provides: “That the regulations of any department or agency affected by the revision of

Titles 1

or 7.1 or such other titles in effect on the effective date of this act shall continue in effect to the extent that they are not in conflict with this act and shall be deemed to be regulations adopted under this act.”

Acts 2005, c. 839, cl. 4, provides: “That the title revisions of

Titles 1

and 7.1 as Chapters 2.1, 3.1, 4, and 5 of Title 1 shall not be construed to require the reappointment of any officer or any member of a board, council, committee or other appointed body referred to in

Titles 1

and 7.1 and each such officer and member shall continue to serve for the term for which appointed pursuant to the provisions of Chapter 2 and Chapter 3 of Title 1 and Title 7.1.”

Acts 2005, c. 839, cl. 5, provides: “That the provisions of § 30-152 of the Code of Virginia shall apply to the revision of

Titles 1

and 7.1 so as to give effect to other laws enacted by the 2005 session of the General Assembly notwithstanding the delay in the effective date of this act.”

Acts 2005, c. 839, cl. 6, provides: “That the repeal of Chapters 2 and 3 of Title 1 and Title 7.1, effective as of October 1, 2005, shall not affect any act or offense done or committed, or any penalty incurred, or any right established, accrued or accruing on or before such date, or any proceeding, prosecution, suit or action pending on that day. Except as otherwise provided in this act, neither the repeal of Chapters 2 and 3 of Title 1 and Title 7.1 nor the enactment of Chapters 2.1, 3.1, 4 and 5 of Title 1 shall apply to offenses committed prior to October 1, 2005, and prosecution for such offenses shall be governed by the prior law, which is continued in effect for that purpose. For the purpose of this enactment, an offense was committed prior to October 1, 2005, if any of the essential elements of the offense occurred prior thereto.”

Acts 2005, c. 839, cl. 7, provides: “That any notice given, recognizance taken, or process or writ issued before October 1, 2005, shall be valid although given, taken or to be returned to a day after such date, in like manner as if Chapters 2.1, 3.1, 4 and 5 of Title 1 had been effective before the same was given, taken or issued.”

Acts 2005, c. 839, cl. 8, provides: “That if any clause, sentence, paragraph, subdivision or section of Chapters 2.1, 3.1, 4 and 5 of Title 1 shall be adjudged in any court of competent jurisdiction to be invalid, the judgment shall not affect, impair or invalidate the remainder thereof, but shall be confined in its operation to the clause, sentence, paragraph, subdivision or section thereof directly involved in the controversy in which the judgment shall have been rendered, and to this end the provisions of Title 1 are declared severable.”

Acts 2005, c. 839, cl. 9, provides: “All actions of any county, city or town or political subdivision of the Commonwealth or any combination thereof identified by population classification under an act of the Assembly enacted prior to July 1, 1960, and of the officers thereof and of the clerks of courts thereof in the operation of their respective offices either on a fee or salary basis for the calendar year of 1961, and until March 30, 1962, are hereby ratified, validated and confirmed.”

Effective date.

This chapter became effective October 1, 2005.

Law Review.

For article, “A Century of Tort Immunities in Virginia,” see 4 U. Rich. L. Rev. 238 (1970).

For survey of Virginia law on torts for the year 1970-71, see 57 Va. L. Rev. 1501 (1971).

For note on law revision and reform in the common-law countries, see 13 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 253 (1971).

For survey of Virginia law on taxation for the year 1972-73, see 59 Va. L. Rev. 1584 (1973).

For survey of Virginia criminal procedure for the year 1977-1978, see 64 Va. L. Rev. 1419 (1978).

For a re-examination of sovereign tort immunity in Virginia, see 15 U. Rich. L. Rev. 247 (1981).

For article on discovery penalties, see 15 U. Rich. L. Rev. 283 (1981).

For comment, “Picking Up the Tab For Your Competitors: Innovator Liability After PLIVA, Inc. v. Mensing,” see 19 Geo. Mason L. Rev. 1257 (2012).

For comment, see “Commonwealth and Constitution,” 48 U. Rich. L. Rev. 415 (2013).

For article, “The Legitimacy of (Some) Federal Common Law,” see 101 Va. L. Rev. 1 (2015).

For article “Making the Case to Avoid Entering the eBay Marketplace: A Recommended Analytical Framework for Evaluating Requests for Permanent Injunctions in Virginia,” see 32 Regent U.L. Rev. 1 (2019).

Research References.

Bryson on Virginia Civil Procedure (Matthew Bender). Chapter 2. Potential Jurisdiction. § 2.02 Subject matter jurisdiction, etc. Bryson.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

17 M.J. Statutes, § 48.

§ 1-201.
Acts of Parliament.

The right and benefit of all writs, remedial and judicial, given by any statute or act of Parliament, made in aid of the common law prior to the fourth year of the reign of James the First, of a general nature, not local to England, shall still be saved, insofar as the same are consistent with the Bill of Rights and Constitution of this Commonwealth and the Acts of Assembly.

History.

Code 1919, § 3, § 1-11; 2005, c. 839.

Law Review.

For note on law revision and reform in the common-law countries, see 13 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 253 (1971).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

17 M.J. Statutes, § 36.